Utah statutes.
4-11-5.   County bee inspector -- Appointment -- Termination -- Compensation.

(1)  The county executive upon the petition of five or more persons who raise bees within the respective county shall, with the approval of the commissioner, appoint a qualified person to act as a bee inspector within the county.

(2)  A county bee inspector shall be employed at the pleasure of the county executive and the commissioner, and is subject to termination of employment, with or without cause, at the instance of either.

(3)  Compensation for the county bee inspector shall be fixed by the county legislative body.

(4)  To be appointed a county bee inspector, a person shall demonstrate adequate training and knowledge related to this chapter, bee diseases, and pests.

(5)  A record concerning bee inspection shall be kept by the county executive or commissioner.

(6)  The county executive and the commissioner shall investigate a formal, written complaint against a county bee inspector.

(7)  The department may authorize an inspection if:

(a)  a county bee inspector is not appointed; and

(b)  a conflict of interest arises with a county bee inspector.



Amended by Chapter 73, 2010 General Session

